Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.310

Licenses for manufacture, sale, distribution, or supply of gambling devices.

No person shall manufacture, and no person shall sell, distribute, furnish or supply to any other person, any gambling device, including but not limited to punchboards and pull-tabs, in this state, or for use within this state, without first obtaining a license to do so from the commission under the provisions of this chapter.

Such licenses shall not be issued by the commission except respecting devices which are designed and permitted for use in connection with activities authorized under this chapter: PROVIDED, That this requirement for licensure shall apply only insofar as the commission has adopted, or may adopt, rules implementing it as to particular categories of gambling devices and related equipment.

[ 1981 c 139 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.